Arkansas, session 2025, SB420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-35-101 is amended to read as follows:
4-35-101. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide a means by which a
nonprofit corporation qualified corporation involved in the sale,
transmission, and distribution of potable water to members of the general
public and commercial, industrial, and other users may form or convert its
entity status from that of a body corporate to that of a public body politic
and governmental entity, thereby allowing the entity the opportunity to
access the tax-exempt capital markets and assuring the State of Arkansas and
the customers of the entity of the lowest water rates possible to be a water
authority.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-35-103(7), concerning the definition of
*JMB397*
03-17-2025 10:10:49 JMB397

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB420
"qualified corporation" within the Water Authority Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(7)(A) “Qualified corporation” means:
(i) any A nonprofit corporation originally formed
pursuant to under the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act of 1993, § 4-33-101
et seq., the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act, § 4-28-201 et seq., or a
predecessor statute, which among other things that provides, distributes,
transmits, treats, pumps, or stores raw or potable water to or for the
benefit of members of the general public and commercial, industrial, and
other users or which that proposes to accomplish, develop, or construct any
of the foregoing; or
(ii) Any governmental entity, municipal nonprofit
entity, municipal authority, governmental authority, investor-owned water or
wastewater utility, improvement district, or rural development authority that
provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps, or stores raw or potable
water to or for the benefit of members of the general public and commercial,
industrial, and other users that proposes to accomplish, develop, or
construct any of the foregoing.
(B) A qualified corporation "Qualified corporation"
includes a nonprofit corporation an entity described under subdivision
(7)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section that constructs, expands, operates, or
maintains a wastewater project or wastewater treatment plant;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-35-202(a), concerning the authority and
procedure to convert to a water authority under the Water Authority Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Whenever a qualified corporation desires to convert to and become
reconstituted as a water authority under and pursuant to this chapter, the
qualified corporation shall present to and file with the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission:
(1) A resolution adopted by the board of directors governing
body of the qualified corporation and, if the qualified corporation has
members, the members of the qualified corporation, which evidences the desire
of the qualified corporation to convert to and become reconstituted as a
water authority and which shall additionally certify that the qualified
corporation:;
03-17-2025 10:10:49 JMB397

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB420
(A) Was initially formed as a nonprofit corporation;
(B) Does not have the ability to directly access the tax-
exempt capital markets other than through a conduit issuer; and
(C) Desires to realize interest rate savings as a result
of its conversion to and reconstitution as a water authority pursuant to this
chapter
(2) If the qualified corporation is a public facilities board,
an ordinance adopted by the governing body of the county or municipality that
formed the public facilities board approving the conversion and
reconstitution of the public facilities board into a water authority;
(2)(3) Articles of conversion and reconstitution which that
shall be signed by a majority of the water authority's proposed initial board
of directors and which shall state and include the following information:
(A) The name of the water authority, which shall include
the words “public water authority”, it being understood that the water
authority may adopt a fictitious operational name upon written request to and
approval by the commission and the Secretary of State;
(B) The location of the water authority's principal
office;
(C) The number of directors of the water authority, which
number shall be at least five (5) and shall be subject to change as provided
in this chapter or in the water authority's bylaws;
(D) The names and addresses of the proposed initial board
of directors of the water authority;
(E) The name and address of the agent for service of
process of the water authority;
(F) The proposed geographic service area over which the
water authority will have jurisdiction; and
(G) Any other matters that the proposed initial board of
directors of the water authority may deem necessary and appropriate;
(3)(4) A copy of the water authority's proposed bylaws along
with any other information which the proposed initial board of directors of
the water authority may deem necessary and appropriate;
(4)(5) A statement and certification from the Secretary of State
that the proposed name of the water authority is not identical to that of any
other water authority in the state or so nearly similar as to lead to
03-17-2025 10:10:49 JMB397

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB420
confusion and uncertainty;
(5)(6) The filing and review fee that the commission may
designate and determine from time to time; and
(6)(7) Any other information and documents which the commission
may designate and require.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-35-203(a)(2), concerning the effect of
formation of a water authority and the filing with the Secretary of State
under the Water Authority Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Contemporaneously therewith, with respect to a
conversion, the qualified corporation shall cease to exist and all assets and
liabilities of every nature, including, without limitation, all real
property, personal property, contractual obligations, lending obligations
outstanding, rights afforded borrowers of federal and state funds, and other
tangible and intangible assets and liabilities of every nature, without need
for further action or approval by any third party, shall be vested in and
shall accrue to the benefit of the water authority, unless the articles of
conversion and reconstitution filed with the Secretary of State expressly
state that the qualified corporation shall continue its corporate or
governmental existence and that certain specified assets and liabilities of
the qualified corporation shall remain with the qualified corporation.
(B) A governmental entity that is converted and
reconstituted as a water authority under this chapter is not required to
comply with other laws or procedures regarding transfer of property by
governmental entities.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-35-203(b)(2), concerning the effect of
formation of a water authority and the filing with the Secretary of State
under the Water Authority Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, filing Filing a copy of the articles of constitution or articles of
conversion and reconstitution, as accepted and approved by the commission,
with the Secretary of State shall serve to terminate and dissolve the
previous corporate existence of the qualified corporation, effective as of
the date of the issuance of the certificate of existence.
(B) A qualified corporation may file a copy of the
03-17-2025 10:10:49 JMB397

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB420
articles of constitution or articles of conversion and reconstitution with
the Secretary of State that expressly states that the qualified corporation
shall continue its corporate or governmental existence.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 4-35-203, concerning the effect of
formation of a water authority and the filing with the Secretary of State
under the Water Authority Act, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(c) Upon receipt of a certificate of existence from the commission
under § 4-35-203(a)(1), the water authority shall be deemed to have complied
with all requirements of this subchapter relating to the proper formation or
conversion and reconstitution of a water authority, including without
limitation all requirements of § 4-35-202.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-5-901(a)(3), concerning the
establishment and uses of the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) The commission may deposit loans made to and bonds, notes,
and other evidences of indebtedness issued by local governmental entities and
other owners of environmental projects in accordance with the Clean Water
Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as existing on January 1, 2025, to finance or
refinance the planning, design, acquisition, construction, expansion,
equipping, rehabilitation, or consolidation of wastewater systems, water
systems, solid and hazardous waste facilities, recycling facilities, nonpoint
source management facilities, wetlands conservation and management
facilities, and other environmental projects or parts of environmental
projects into the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 15-5-909(8), concerning the definition of
"owner" regarding the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund, is amended
to read as follows:
(8) “Owner” means the owner or prospective owner, whether public
or private, of an environmental project, excluding any federal agencies;

/s/Hester

03-17-2025 10:10:49 JMB397